Ohio, session 136, HB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 955.201 and 5747.113 be amended and section 955.202 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 955.201. (A) As used in this section and in section 955.202 of the Revised Code, "Ohio pet fund" means a nonprofit corporation organized by that name under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code that consists of humane societies, veterinarians, animal shelters, companion animal breeders, dog wardens, or similar individuals and entities. (B) The Ohio pet fund shall do all of the following: (1) Establish eligibility criteria for organizations that may receive financial assistance from the Ohio pet fund. Those organizations may include any of the following: (a) An animal shelter as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code; (b) A local nonprofit veterinary association that operates a program for the sterilization of dogs and cats; (c) A charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and a purpose of which is to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and cats and educational programs concerning the proper veterinary care of those animals. (2) Establish procedures for applying for financial assistance from the Ohio pet fund. Application procedures shall require eligible organizations to submit detailed proposals that outline the intended uses of the moneys sought. (3) Establish eligibility criteria for sterilization and educational programs for which moneys from the Ohio pet fund may be used and, consistent with division (C) of this section, establish eligibility criteria for individuals who seek sterilization for their dogs and cats from eligible organizations; (4) Establish procedures for the disbursement of moneys the Ohio pet fund receives from license plate contributions pursuant to division (C) of section 4503.551 of the Revised Code and section 955.202 of the Revised Code; (5) Advertise or otherwise provide notification of the availability of financial assistance from the Ohio pet fund for eligible organizations; (6) Design markings to be inscribed on "pets" license plates under section 4503.551 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The owner of a dog or cat is eligible for dog or cat sterilization services from an eligible organization when those services are subsidized in whole or in part by money from the Ohio pet fund if any of the following applies: (a) The income of the owner's family does not exceed one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guideline. (b) The owner, or any member of the owner's family who resides with the owner, is a recipient or beneficiary of one of the following government assistance programs: (i) Low-income housing assistance under the "United States Housing Act of 1937," 42 U.S.C.A. 1437f, as amended, known as the federal section 8 housing program; (ii) The Ohio works first program established by Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code; (iii) The medicaid program; (iv) A program or law administered by the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration for any service-connected disability; (v) The supplemental nutrition assistance program established under the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.), administered by the department of job and family services under section 5101.54 of the Revised Code; (vi) The "special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children" established under the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 885, 42 U.S.C. 1786, as amended, administered by the department of health under section 3701.132 of the Revised Code; (vii) Supplemental security income under Title XVI of the "Social Security Act," 86 Stat. 1475 (1972), 42 U.S.C.A. 1383, as amended; (viii) Social security disability insurance benefits provided under Title II of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C.A. 401, as amended. (c) The owner of the dog or cat submits to the eligible organization operating the sterilization program either of the following: (i) A certificate of adoption showing that the dog or cat was adopted from a licensed animal shelter, a municipal, county, or regional pound, or a holding and impoundment facility that contracts with a municipal corporation; (ii) A certificate of adoption showing that the dog or cat was adopted through a nonprofit corporation operating an animal adoption referral service whose holding facility, if any, is licensed in accordance with state law or a municipal ordinance. (2) The Ohio pet fund shall determine the type of documentary evidence that must be presented by the owner of a dog or cat to show that the income of the owner's family does not exceed one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guideline or that the owner is eligible under division (C)(1)(b) of this section. (D) As used in division (C) of this section, "federal poverty guideline" means the official poverty guideline as revised annually by the United States department of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981," 95 Stat. 511, 42 U.S.C.A. 9902, as amended, for a family size equal to the size of the family of the person whose income is being determined. Sec. 955.202. The companion animal fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money credited to it under section 5747.113 of the Revised Code, donations, gifts, bequests, and any other money received for the purposes of section 955.201 of the Revised Code. The Ohio pet fund shall use money in the fund for the purposes of that section. Sec. 5747.113. (A) Any taxpayer claiming a refund under section 5747.11 of the Revised Code who wishes to contribute any part of the taxpayer's refund to the natural areas and preserves fund created in section 1517.11 of the Revised Code, the nongame and endangered wildlife fund created in section 1531.26 of the Revised Code, the military injury relief fund created in section 5902.05 of the Revised Code, the Ohio history fund created in section 149.308 of the Revised Code, the breast and cervical cancer project income tax contribution fund created in section 3701.601 of the Revised Code, the wishes for sick children income tax contribution fund created in section 3701.602 of the Revised Code, the companion animal fund created in section 955.202 of the Revised Code, or all of those funds may designate on the taxpayer's income tax return the amount that the taxpayer wishes to contribute to the fund or funds. A designated contribution is irrevocable upon the filing of the return and shall be made in the full amount designated if the refund found due the taxpayer upon the initial processing of the taxpayer's return, after any deductions including those required by section 5747.12 of the Revised Code, is greater than or equal to the designated contribution. If the refund due as initially determined is less than the designated contribution, the contribution shall be made in the full amount of the refund. The tax commissioner shall subtract the amount of the contribution from the amount of the refund initially found due the taxpayer and shall certify the difference to the director of budget and management and treasurer of state for payment to the taxpayer in accordance with section 5747.11 of the Revised Code. For the purpose of any subsequent determination of the taxpayer's net tax payment, the contribution shall be considered a part of the refund paid to the taxpayer. (B) The tax commissioner shall provide a space on the income tax return form in which a taxpayer may indicate that the taxpayer wishes to make a donation in accordance with this section. The tax commissioner shall also print in the instructions accompanying the income tax return form a description of the purposes for which the natural areas and preserves fund, the nongame and endangered wildlife fund, the military injury relief fund, the Ohio history fund, the breast and cervical cancer project income tax contribution fund, and the wishes for sick children income tax contribution fund, and the companion animal fund were created and the use of moneys from the income tax refund contribution system established in this section. No person shall designate on the person's income tax return any part of a refund claimed under section 5747.11 of the Revised Code as a contribution to any fund other than the natural areas and preserves fund, the nongame and endangered wildlife fund, the military injury relief fund, the Ohio history fund, the breast and cervical cancer project income tax contribution fund, or the wishes for sick children income tax contribution fund, or the companion animal fund. (C) The money collected under the income tax refund contribution system established in this section shall be deposited by the tax commissioner into the natural areas and preserves fund, the nongame and endangered wildlife fund, the military injury relief fund, the Ohio history fund, the breast and cervical cancer project income tax contribution fund, and the wishes for sick children income tax contribution fund, and the companion animal fund in the amounts designated on the tax returns. (D) If the total amount contributed to a fund under this section, as annually determined by the tax commissioner, is less than fifty thousand dollars in each of five consecutive calendar years, no person may designate a contribution to that fund for any taxable year ending after the last day of that five-year period. In such a case, the commissioner shall remove the space dedicated to the fund on the income tax return and the description of the fund in the instructions accompanying the income tax return. (E) The general assembly may authorize taxpayer refund contributions to no more than six funds under the income tax refund contribution system established in this section. If the general assembly authorizes income tax refund contributions to a fund other than the natural areas and preserves fund, the nongame and endangered wildlife fund, the military injury relief fund, the Ohio history fund, the breast and cervical cancer project income tax contribution fund, or the wishes for sick children income tax contribution fund, such contributions may be authorized only for a period of two calendar years. With the exception of the Ohio history fund and the companion animal fund, the general assembly may authorize income tax refund contributions to a fund only if all the money in the fund will be expended or distributed by a state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) The director of natural resources, in January of every odd-numbered year, shall report to the general assembly on the effectiveness of the income tax refund contribution system as it pertains to the natural areas and preserves fund and the nongame and endangered wildlife fund. The report shall include the amount of money contributed to each fund in each of the previous five years, the amount of money contributed directly to each fund in addition to or independently of the income tax refund contribution system in each of the previous five years, and the purposes for which the money was expended. (2) The director of veterans services, the director of the Ohio history connection, the director of the Ohio pet fund, and the director of health, in January of every odd-numbered year, each shall report to the general assembly on the effectiveness of the income tax refund contribution system as it pertains to the military injury relief fund, the Ohio history fund, the companion animal fund, the breast and cervical cancer project income tax contribution fund, and the wishes for sick children income tax contribution fund respectively. The report shall include the amount of money contributed to the fund in each of the previous five years, the amount of money contributed directly to the fund in addition to or independently of the income tax refund contribution system in each of the previous five years, and the purposes for which the money was expended. Section 2. That existing sections 955.201 and 5747.113 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.